District of Columbia statutes.
16-1704

Cheating at gambling.

Whoever, at any one time or sitting, by fraud or false pretense, while playing any game, or while having a share in a wager played for, or while betting on the sides or hands of persons who play, wins, or acquires to himself or to any other person, above the sum or value of $25, shall, upon conviction of the offense, forfeit five times the value of the sum of money or other thing so won, and shall be deemed infamous.

The penalty prescribed by this section may be recovered in a civil action by the persons specified by, and in the manner provided by, section 16-1702 .

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 583, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1

History

Indigents, representation in criminal cases, see § 11-2601.
Superior Court, civil jurisdiction, see § 11-921.

Cross References

1981 Ed., § 16-1704.
1973 Ed., § 16-1704.

Prior Codifications